Maine, session 132, LD939.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §9324, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 56, §4, is amended to
read:
9. Recreational campfires. A person who kindles or uses a recreational campfire,
other than a licensed camping facility, may not allow the recreational campfire to exceed 3
feet 42 inches in diameter on the ground at the base of the fire or 3 feet in height.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §9325, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 56, §6, is further
amended to read:
A. A recreational campfire kindled when the ground is covered by snow or on a frozen
body of water, as long as the recreational campfire does not exceed 3 feet 42 inches in
diameter on the ground at the base of the fire and does not exceed 3 feet in height;